Utah statutes.
9-3-405.   Member or employee -- Disclosure of interest.
Any member or employee of the authority who has, will have, or later acquires
an interest, direct or indirect, in any transaction with the authority shall
immediately disclose the nature and extent of that interest in writing to the
authority as soon as the member has knowledge of the actual or prospective
interest. This disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority.
Upon this disclosure that member or employee may participate in any action by
the authority authorizing the transaction.
